Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7410
Applicability to actions on or after July 15, 1998.

The Unfair Discrimination Against Subjects of Abuse in Insurance Act applies to all actions taken on or after July 15, 1998, except as otherwise explicitly stated. Nothing in the act shall require an insurer to conduct a comprehensive search of its contract files existing on July 15, 1998, solely to determine which applicants or insureds are subjects of abuse.

Laws 1998, LB 1035, § 23.